Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 42.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,358
All-terrain
vehicle; utility-type vehicle; equipment
required.

Every all-terrain vehicle and utility-type vehicle shall
be equipped with:

(1) A brake system maintained in good operating condition;

(2) An adequate muffler system in good working condition;
and

(3) A United States Forest Service qualified spark arrester.

Laws 1987, LB 80, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 60-2804;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 454;

Laws 2010, LB650, § 42.